pl: Zgodny rozmiar osi: 10 mm (3/8 in); 12 mm; 14 mm; 15 mm; 3/8 in 24 TPI; 3/8 in 26 TPI; Inny
de: Kompatible Achsengröße: 10 mm (3/8 Zoll); 12 mm; 14 mm; 15 mm; 3/8 Zoll 24 TPI; 3/8 Zoll 26 TPI; Sonstige
sv: Kompatibel axelstorlek: 10 mm (3/8 tum); 12 mm; 14 mm; 15 mm; 3/8 tum 24 TPI; 3/8 tum 26 TPI; Övrigt
ro-RO: Dimensiune axă compatibilă: 10 mm (3/8 in); 12 mm; 14 mm; 15 mm; 3/8 in 24 TPI; 3/8 in 26 TPI; Altele
fi: Yhteensopiva akselikoko: 10 mm (3/8 in); 12 mm; 14 mm; 15 mm; 3/8 in 24 TPI; 3/8 in 26 TPI; Muu
sk-SK: Veľkosť kompatibilnej nápravy: 10 mm (3/8 in); 12 mm; 14 mm; 15 mm; 3/8 in 24 TPI; 3/8 in 26 TPI; Iné
hu: Kompatibilis tengelyméret: 10 mm (3/8 in); 12 mm; 14 mm; 15 mm; 3/8 in 24 TPI; 3/8 in 26 TPI; Egyéb
nb: Kompatibel akselstørrelse: 10 mm (3/8 tommer); 12 mm; 14 mm; 15 mm; 3/8 tommer 24 TPI; 3/8 tommer 26 TPI; Annet
ru: Совместимый размер оси: 10 мм (3/8 дюйма); 12 мм; 14 мм; 15 мм; 3/8 дюйма 24 TPI; 3/8 дюйма 26 TPI; Другое
ko: 호환 액슬 크기: 10mm(3/8인치); 12mm; 14mm; 15mm; 3/8인치 24 TPI; 3/8인치 26 TPI; 기타
lt-LT: Suderinamo dydžio ašis: 10 mm (3/8 col.); 12 mm; 14 mm; 15 mm; 3/8 col., 24 TPI; 3/8 col., 26 TPI; Kita
sl-SI: Združljiva velikost osi: 10 mm (3/8 in); 12 mm; 14 mm; 15 mm; 3/8 in 24 TPI; 3/8 in 26 TPI; Drugo
ja: 対応軸サイズ: 10 mm (3/8インチ); 12 mm; 14 mm; 15 mm; 3/8インチ 24 TPI; 3/8インチ 26 TPI; その他
da: Kompatibel akselstørrelse: 10 mm (3/8 tommer); 12 mm; 14 mm; 15 mm; 3/8 tommer 24 TPI; 3/8 tommer 26 TPI; Andet
pt-PT: Tamanho de eixo compatível: 10 mm (3/8 pol.); 12 mm; 14 mm; 15 mm; 3/8 pol. 24 TPI; 3/8 pol. 26 TPI; Outro
bg-BG: Съвместим размер на оста: 10 mm (3/8 in); 12 mm; 14 mm; 15 mm; 3/8 in 24 TPI; 3/8 in 26 TPI; Друго
en: Compatible axle size: 10 mm (3/8 in); 12 mm; 14 mm; 15 mm; 3/8 in 24 TPI; 3/8 in 26 TPI; Other
cs: Kompatibilní velikost nápravy: 10 mm (3/8 palce); 12 mm; 14 mm; 15 mm; 3/8 palce, 24 TPI; 3/8 palce, 26 TPI; Ostatní
vi: Kích thước trục tương thích: 10 mm (3/8 in); 12 mm; 14 mm; 15 mm; 3/8 in 24 TPI; 3/8 in 26 TPI; Khác
hr-HR: Kompatibilna veličina osovine: 10 mm (3/8 in); 12 mm; 14 mm; 15 mm; 3/8 in 24 TPI; 3/8 in 26 TPI; Ostalo
tr: Uyumlu aks boyutu: 10 mm (3/8 inç); 12 mm; 14 mm; 15 mm; 3/8 inç 24 TPI; 3/8 inç 26 TPI; Diğer
pt-BR: Tamanho de eixo compatível: 10 mm (3/8 pol.); 12 mm; 14 mm; 15 mm; 3/8 pol. 24 TPI; 3/8 pol. 26 TPI; Outro
es: Tamaño de eje compatible: 10 mm (3/8 pulg); 12 mm; 14 mm; 15 mm; 3/8 pulg 24 TPI; 3/8 pulg 26 TPI; Otro
it: Dimensioni dell'asse compatibili: 10 mm (3/8 in); 12 mm; 14 mm; 15 mm; 3/8 in 24 TPI; 3/8 in 26 TPI; Altro
zh-TW: 相容軸尺寸: 10 公釐 (3/8 吋); 12 公釐; 14 公釐; 15 公釐; 3/8 吋 24 TPI; 3/8 吋 26 TPI; 其他
th: ขนาดเพลาที่เข้ากันได้: 10 มม. (3/8 นิ้ว); 12 มม.; 14 มม.; 15 มม.; 3/8 นิ้ว 24 TPI; 3/8 นิ้ว 26 TPI; อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 适用轴径尺寸: 10 毫米（3/8 英寸）; 12 毫米; 14 毫米; 15 毫米; 3/8 英寸 24 TPI; 3/8 英寸 26 TPI; 其他
fr: Dimensions d'essieu compatibles: 10 mm (3/8 po); 12 mm; 14 mm; 15 mm; 3/8 po 24 TPI; 3/8 po 26 TPI; Autre
nl: Compatibel asformaat: 10 mm (3/8 inch); 12 mm; 14 mm; 15 mm; 3/8 inch 24 TPI; 3/8 inch 26 TPI; Overige
el: Συμβατό μέγεθος άξονα: 10 mm (3/8 in); 12 mm; 14 mm; 15 mm; 3/8 in 24 TPI; 3/8 in 26 TPI; Άλλο